Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-9,109
Employees retirement system; investments; default of principal or interest; trustees; powers and duties.

Prior to January 1, 2017, in the event of default in the payment of principal of, or interest on, the investments made, the board of trustees are authorized to institute the proper proceedings to collect such matured principal or interest, and may, with approval of the board of education or Class V Retirement System Board, accept for exchange purposes, refunding bonds or other evidences of indebtedness with interest rates to be agreed upon with the obligor. Prior to January 1, 2017, the board of trustees, with the approval of the board of education or Class V Retirement System Board, are further authorized to make such compromises, adjustments, or disposition of the past-due interest or principal as are in default, or to make such compromises and adjustments as to future payments of interest or principal as deemed advisable for the purpose of protecting the investment.

Laws 1967, c. 545, § 3, p. 1792;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1051.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 644;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 69;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 40.